Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 14-108.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 14-108.1. A. Neither a notary public nor an agent
working on behalf of a notary public shall be authorized to:
1. Request absentee ballots on behalf of a voter other than
himself or herself;
2. Assist a voter in requesting absentee ballots, other than
for himself or herself or a member of his or her household;
3. Receive by mail an absentee ballot on behalf of a voter,
other than for himself or herself or a member of his or her
household; or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2191 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. Submit a completed absentee ballot on behalf of a voter
other than for himself or herself.
B. 1. A notary public shall maintain a log of all absentee
ballot affidavits that he or she notarizes for a period of at least
two (2) years after the date of the election. The log shall include
the name of the voter and the date, time, and method of
identification.
2. a. A notary public who is authorized to notarize more
than twenty absentee ballot affidavits at a single
election, as provided in paragraph 3 of subsection C
of this section, shall submit a copy of the log to the
secretary of the county election board who granted the
written permission. The copy of the log must be
received by the secretary of the county election board
no later than the close of business on the fifth
business day following the date of the election.
b. The log shall be a public record and shall be
maintained by the secretary of the county election
board pursuant to Section 3-126 of this title.
c. A notary public who fails to submit the log as
required by this section, or who notarizes more than
twenty absentee ballots without authorization pursuant
to paragraph 3 of subsection C of this section, shall

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2191 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

have his or her notary public appointment revoked for
eight (8) years by the Secretary of State.
C. 1. If a notary public willfully and intentionally violates
the provisions of this section, then that notary public shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of up to Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00).
2. A notary public shall be authorized to notarize a maximum of
twenty absentee ballot affidavits for a single election, except as
provided in paragraphs 2 3 and 3 4 of this subsection.
2. 3. A notary public may be authorized to notarize more than
twenty absentee ballot affidavits at a single election with the
written approval of the secretary of the county election board.
Such approval shall apply for affidavits notarized within the county
served by the county election board secretary.
3. 4. The limitation required by this subsection shall not
apply to the notarizing of absentee ballot affidavits at the place
of business of a notary public that is open to the general public
during the normal business hours of the notary public.
D. 1. If more than ten absentee ballots for a single election
are requested to be mailed to a single mailing address, the
secretary of the county election board shall immediately notify the
district attorney for that county and the Secretary of the State
Election Board.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2191 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Upon receipt of such notification, the district attorney, or
a member of law enforcement designated by the district attorney,
shall investigate any possible criminal violation of the law related
to the absentee ballot requests.
3. Provided, this notification requirement shall not apply to
requests for absentee ballots to be sent to the addresses of nursing
homes, veterans centers, medical facilities, multiunit housing,
installations of the Armed Forces of the United States where
uniformed or overseas voters, as defined by the Uniformed and
Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, are stationed or other
locations authorized in writing by the Secretary of the State
Election Board.
E. The provisions of this section shall only apply to an
election conducted by a county election board, the State Election
Board or a political subdivision of this state.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
April 22, 2025 - DO PASS







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2191 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)